Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.720

Child care expansion grant fund.

(1) The legislature recognizes that a severe shortage of child care exists to the detriment of all families and employers throughout the state. Many workers are unable to enter or remain in the workforce due to a shortage of child care resources. The high costs of starting a child care business create a barrier to the creation of new slots, especially for children with special needs.

(2) A child care expansion grant fund is created in the custody of the secretary of the department of social and health services. Grants shall be awarded on a one-time only basis to persons, organizations, or schools needing assistance to start a child care center or mini-center as defined by the department by rule, or to existing licensed child care providers, including family home providers, for the purpose of making capital improvements in order to accommodate children with disabilities, sick children, or infant care, or children needing nighttime care. No grant may exceed ten thousand dollars. Start-up costs shall not include operational costs after the first three months of business.

(3) Child care expansion grants shall be awarded on the basis of need for the proposed services in the community, within appropriated funds.

(4) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW setting forth criteria, application procedures, and methods to assure compliance with the purposes described in this section.

[ 2020 c 274 s 26; 1988 c 213 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.215.555, 74.13.095.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 213: See note following RCW 43.216.660.